Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.190

Licensing by endorsement.

The secretary may license a person without examination if such person is credentialed as an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, or equivalent, in another jurisdiction if, in the secretary's judgment, the requirements of that jurisdiction are equivalent to or greater than those of Washington state.

[ 2019 c 308 s 10; 2010 c 286 s 10; 1995 c 323 s 13; 1991 c 3 s 18; 1985 c 326 s 19.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.